Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2187
Encumbrances; referee; appointment; report; appeal.

If deemed advisable, the court may appoint a referee to inquire into the nature and amount of encumbrances, and report accordingly. From that report an appeal lies to the court.

R.S.1867, Code § 820, p. 539;

R.S.1913, § 8303;

C.S.1922, § 9255;

C.S.1929, § 20-2187;

R.S.1943, § 25-2187.

Referee may inquire into and report as to the nature and the amount of encumbrances. Hartman v. Drake, 166 Neb. 87, 87 N.W.2d 895 (1958).